Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 8 Department of Finance and Administration
25-10-134. Community-based residential programs — Rules.

(1)The Department of Human Services shall not contract for community-based residential programs within any municipalities to house unrelated juveniles who have been adjudicated delinquent for a sexual offense or serious violent offense, or convicted of a sexual offense or a serious violent offense, until a community-based program has complied with rules promulgated by the department as set out herein.

The purpose of these rules is to ensure public notice and public safety in the department's process of contracting for residential services for adjudicated or convicted juvenile sexual offenders or adjudicated or convicted serious violent offenders.

Provided further, the rules shall be developed by the department and members of a committee appointed by the Governor, to include representatives of the following:

The General Assembly;

Local elected officials;

Citizen representatives of local communities;

Prosecuting attorneys;

Judges of circuit court, juvenile division;

Community-based providers;

Law enforcement officers; and

At least one (1) recognized mental health professional who specializes in the treatment of juvenile sexual offenders and juvenile serious violent offenders.

The rules shall include, but are not limited to, the following:

Definitions for the terms “sexual offense” and “sexual offender” and “serious violent offense” and “serious violent offender” for purposes of this section;

Procedures for notice to residents within a specified geographic area of a proposed residential program for juvenile sexual offenders and juvenile serious violent offenders, as defined in the rules;

Procedures for preplacement review of juvenile sexual offenders and juvenile serious violent offenders to determine that individual placements are appropriate, taking into account the location of a facility and a juvenile's offense or offenses, past treatment, prognosis, and present behavior;

Procedures to determine that the level of supervision in a residential program is adequate for the individuals housed in the program; and

Procedures for the department and a community-based contract provider to receive and respond to complaints and questions of residents of a community in which a community-based program is proposed or established, including remedies for a failure to respond.

(1)The department shall not contract or pay for community-based residential programs within any municipality to house unrelated persons who have been adjudicated delinquent of an act that would constitute a Class A felony or higher or of a sexual offense, or convicted of a Class A felony or higher or sexual offense, until the following conditions have been met:

Residents within one thousand feet (1,000') of the proposed location of the facility shall be notified by mail; and

(i)A public hearing shall be conducted in the community of the proposed location of the facility by the contract provider at least ten (10) days in advance of the contract's effective date.

Notice of the hearing shall be made by mail to each of the residents within one thousand feet (1,000') of the proposed location of the facility.

The notification requirement shall not apply to already existing facilities at already existing locations.

Provided further, upon establishment of such facilities within a particular municipality, the contract provider and the department shall establish and implement a system to receive and respond to complaints and questions from residents of such municipality.

In the event the department and the provider fail to provide satisfactory communication to the residents, as provided in this subsection, such facility may be declared a public nuisance by the municipality.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, §§ 100-102; 2019, No. 315, § 2917.

25-10-135. Youth services.

The Department of Human Services shall not contract or pay for community-based residential programs within any municipality to house unrelated persons who have been adjudicated delinquent of an act that would constitute a Class A felony or higher or of a sexual offense or convicted of a Class A felony or higher or sexual offense until the following conditions have been met:

Residents within one thousand feet (1,000') of the proposed location of the facility shall be notified by mail;

(A)A public hearing shall be conducted in the community of the proposed location of the facility by the contract provider at least ten (10) days in advance of the contract's effective date.

In the event the department and the provider fail to provide satisfactory communication to the residents as provided in this section, the facility may be declared a public nuisance by the municipality.

History.

Acts 1997, No. 1360, § 99.

25-10-136. Private service contract notice required.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 525, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5254.

25-10-137. Private service contract performance evaluation requirement.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 525, § 2.

25-10-138. Education requirements for certain Division of Youth Services employees.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 469, § 1; 2019, No. 315, § 2918; 2019, No. 910, § 6303.

25-10-139. Training requirements for certain Division of Youth Services employees.

The training requirements shall include, but not be limited to, training on the use of proper restraints and security crisis intervention as recommended by the Manual of Standards for Juvenile Training Schools and Services published by the American Correctional Association in cooperation with the Commission on Accreditation for Corrections.

The training hours shall be satisfied by the employee on a yearly basis.

History.

Acts 1999, No. 469, § 2; 2019, No. 315, §§ 2919, 2920.

25-10-140. [Repealed.]

The person subpoenaed does not have relevant, admissible evidence;

The information or records sought are irrelevant to the adjudication;

The information or records sought are confidential and not subject to disclosure or to production under federal laws or regulations or state law;

Compliance with the subpoena would result in undue burden or expense; or

The evidence possessed by the person subpoenaed or the information or record sought is unduly repetitious of other available evidence.

History.

Acts 2011, No. 1139, § 5.

25-10-142. [Repealed.]

Except as provided under subsection (h) of this section, the opinion is binding upon the secretary with respect to that provider only.

If the secretary cannot respond to the request for an advisory opinion, the secretary shall within thirty (30) days notify the provider that he or she will not be responding to the request for an opinion.

A substantive question or a procedural matter;

Questions arising before an audit or investigation concerning a provider's claim for payment or reimbursement; and

A hypothetical or projected service plan.

History.

Acts 2013, No. 1499, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5255.

25-10-144. Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism — Creation.

There is established a Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism.

The purposes of the Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism are to:

(1)The Governor's Advisory Commission on National Service and Volunteerism shall consist of fifteen (15) to twenty-five (25) voting members to be appointed by the Governor.

The voting members shall include:

The members initially appointed shall draw lots for staggered terms, such that an equal number of terms shall expire each calendar year.

(A)In the event of a vacancy, the Governor shall appoint an eligible member to serve the remainder of the term.

History.

Acts 2015, No. 111, § 2; 2017, No. 913, §§ 7, 8; 2019, No. 910, §§ 2385, 2386.

Subchapter 2

— Division of State Services for the Blind

25-10-201. Public policy.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-939; Acts 2020, No. 168, § 7.

25-10-202. Definitions.

As used in this subchapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Blind”, for the purposes of qualification for appointment as a member of the Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind within the Department of Commerce, means a person having not more than twenty/two hundred (20/200) visual acuity in the better eye with corrective lenses, or visual acuity greater than twenty/two hundred (20/200), but with a limitation in the field of vision such that the widest diameter of the visual field subtends an angle of no greater than twenty degrees (20°); and

“Visually handicapped”, as a term, shall be defined by rules of the board, and the board shall have sole and exclusive authority to define and determine whether any person is “blind” or “visually handicapped” for purposes of determining eligibility to participate in government programs under this subchapter.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (2).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-942; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2921.

25-10-203. Exemption.

No provision of this subchapter shall apply to any program or service currently operated or administered by the Arkansas School for the Blind or the State Library Board, and this subchapter shall not amend or repeal any statutory provision governing the operation of the School for the Blind or the Arkansas State Library.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-945.

25-10-204. Powers and duties.

The Division of State Services for the Blind within the Department of Human Services is designated as the agency of the State of Arkansas primarily responsible for carrying out state and federal programs for rehabilitative social services or business enterprises for blind and visually handicapped citizens of the state, including, but not limited to, those programs and services established pursuant to the Rehabilitation Act of 1973, as amended, Pub. L. No. 93-112, and any subsequent legislation to Pub. L. No. 93-112. The division, as the designated agency, shall receive the full, complete, effective, and timely cooperation of any and all other agencies, organizations, or offices receiving financial support by or through the State of Arkansas, either directly or indirectly, and in any amount.

The division shall be responsible for the administration of all functions and programs relating or pertaining to rehabilitation and social services, and business enterprise services for the blind, including the organized vending facility program as now established, for which the division shall serve as the licensing agency for the blind.

The division is designated as the unit of the state government of Arkansas primarily responsible for assuring that citizens with disabling visual impairments shall receive the full benefit of services for which federal grants-in-aid assistance in any form, under any title, and from any source shall be available from time to time to accomplish the purposes of this subchapter.

The division is authorized to enter into such contracts with the federal government, to submit such plans to the federal government, and to adopt such methods of administration as the federal government may require in order to assure maximum federal financial involvement in those services and functions which the division is authorized to administer directly.

The division may assist all other state agencies, departments, offices, or committees traditionally and legally responsible for the direct administration of services which bear upon the objective of preventing or ameliorating disabling visual impairments throughout the State of Arkansas by providing technical advice and consultation to those state organizations, reviewing plans and program material developed and maintained within those state organizations, making appropriate recommendations, and carrying out the evaluation functions previously assigned to the Office for the Blind and Visually Impaired.

Where it is mutually determined by the division and one (1) or more other state agencies that it would be to the best interest of the taxpayers of the state or to the advantage of individuals with disabling visual impairments for the other agency or agencies directly to provide a particular service which tends to prevent or ameliorate disabling visual impairments, the division and the state agency or agencies involved are authorized to enter into interagency contracts or agreements which might reasonably be necessary to assure that the service is provided effectively and in a manner consistent with maximally efficient use of available resources.

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1983, No. 481, § 5, in part, transferred the Office for the Blind and Visually Impaired of the Department of Human Services, and all its powers, personnel, equipment, etc., to the Division of State Services for the Blind.

U.S. Code. The Rehabilitation Act of 1973, referred to in this section, is codified as 29 U.S.C. § 701 et seq.

One (1) member shall be appointed by the Governor after consulting each of the following:

The National Federation of the Blind of Arkansas;

The American Council of the Blind of Arkansas;

The Arkansas Lions Clubs Council of Governors, who shall be a member of a member club of the International Association of Lions Clubs within Multiple District Seven for Arkansas;

The Association for Education and Rehabilitation of the Blind and Visually Impaired; and

The Arkansas School for the Blind.

After the members of the board have been duly appointed and are serving, the board shall choose a chair from among the regular members as presiding officer, who shall serve for a term of two (2) years. The board shall also elect from among its regular members a vice chair and a secretary, who shall serve for a term of one (1) year.

The board shall meet at least quarterly at those times and places as it may determine from time to time.

The board shall employ a commissioner, subject to the approval of the Governor, qualified by experience to administer and implement the policies and directives of the board.

The commissioner shall report to the Secretary of the Department of Commerce.

The board may employ or appoint any additional personnel necessary to carry out the functions, duties, and responsibilities entrusted to the Division of State Services for the Blind in accordance with the requirements of law and within the limits of available appropriations.

Amendments. The 2015 amendment redesignated former (a)(1)(B) as (a)(1)(B)(i); rewrote the introductory language of (a)(1)(B)(i); and added (a)(1)(B)(ii).

The 2019 amendment redesignated the former first sentence of (h) as (h)(1), inserted (h)(2), and redesignated the former second sentence of (h) as (h)(3).

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, §§ 5, 6; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-943, 5-944.

25-10-205. Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind.

There is created a board to be known as the Board of the Division of State Services for the Blind, to be constituted as follows:

(A)The board shall be composed of seven (7) members appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate.

Appointments made by the Governor under subdivision (a)(1)(B)(i) of this section shall be subject to confirmation by the Senate.

The Governor shall appoint two (2) at-large members.

One (1) or more of the members of the board shall be at least fifty-five (55) years of age.

At least four (4) members of the board shall be blind as defined in §25-10-202.

Any board member whose term has expired shall continue to serve as a member of the board until the member's successor is appointed and qualified;

All board members shall be appointed for terms of four (4) years, and no person may serve more than two (2) consecutive full terms; and

All vacancies which occur for any reason shall be filled by appointment by the Governor, and any interim appointments shall be limited to the unexpired term of the position vacated. Any person appointed to fill a vacancy shall meet the qualifications for appointment held by his or her predecessor on the board.

The President of World Services for the Blind, the Superintendent of the Arkansas School for the Blind, one (1) representative appointed by the American Association of Workers for the Blind of Arkansas, one (1) representative appointed by the Blinded Veterans Association of Arkansas, and one (1) representative appointed by the Arkansas Association of Blind Business Managers shall serve as ex officio nonvoting members of the board. Additional ex officio nonvoting members may be appointed by the Governor at the request of a majority of the board.

Each member or ex officio member appointed to the board, before entering upon the duties of office, shall take the oath prescribed by the Arkansas Constitution for state officers and shall file the oath in the office of the Secretary of State, who shall thereupon issue to the member a certificate of appointment.

Upon recommendation of a majority of the regular board members, the Governor may remove any member of the board at any time for misconduct, incompetency, neglect of duty, or any other good cause as may be determined by the board.

The board members shall not receive compensation for performance of their duties. However, they may receive expense reimbursement in accordance with §25-16-901 et seq.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, §§ 2, 3; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-940, 5-941; Acts 1997, No. 250, § 235; 2015, No. 1100, § 60; 2019, No. 910, § 613.

25-10-206. Legal counsel.

The Division of State Services for the Blind within the Department of Commerce or any employees or committees thereof shall be entitled to the services of the Attorney General in connection with the operation of the affairs of the division.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-947; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 614.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Commerce” for “Department of Human Services”.

25-10-207. State Services for the Blind Fund Account.

Any sums provided by the General Assembly for the purposes of this subchapter shall be kept by the Treasurer of State in a fund to be designated as the “State Services for the Blind Fund Account” and shall be used to carry out the particular purposes assigned to it in this subchapter.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 481, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-946; Acts 1993, No. 403, § 20; 2019, No. 910, § 615.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “State Services for the Blind Fund Account” for “State Services for the Blind Fund Account of the Department of Human Services Fund”.

25-10-208. State services for the blind — Supplemental insurance.

Staff members who transport blind and visually impaired persons on official state business of the Division of State Services for the Blind within the Department of Commerce are entitled to reimbursement for supplemental insurance costs. Costs incurred for supplemental liability automobile insurance above the minimum required by law for the purpose of including coverage for work-related activities shall be reimbursed through standard travel procedures annually, not to exceed fifty dollars ($50.00) per year.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1198, § 68; 2019, No. 910, § 616.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Department of Commerce” for “Department of Human Services” in the first sentence.

25-10-209. Information Reading Services for the Blind created.

Information Reading Services for the Blind is created within the Division of State Services for the Blind.

The Information Reading Services for the Blind shall be:

An integral part of the rehabilitation state plan of the division;

A network to:

Provide audible access to statewide public notices, newspaper articles of interest, and other information, particularly at the local level, to persons who are visually handicapped; and

Translate existing local, state, and national information into an audible format to make it available for access by visually handicapped persons; and

Available to all state agencies as a means of making public notices audibly accessible to visually handicapped persons who cannot read print.

This section does not limit the eligibility of the Information Reading Services for the Blind to receive line-item state or federal grant funding targeted solely for support of its programming.

The Director of the Division of State Services for the Blind shall consult at least annually with active consumers of the Information Reading Services for the Blind, including participating state agencies, in the design, improvement, and delivery of the services.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2007, No. 74, § 1, provided:

“Public policy — Findings.

“(a) It is the public policy of the State of Arkansas to:

“(1) Provide visually handicapped persons with services that are reasonably necessary to allow visually handicapped persons the opportunity to lead full, useful, and productive lives; and

“(2) Expend funds intended to improve the lives of visually handicapped persons in the most efficient and effective manner possible.

“(b) The General Assembly finds that the purposes set forth in subsection (a) of this section may be advanced by the establishment in law of an Information Reading Services for the Blind within the Division of State Services for the Blind of the Department of Health and Human Services to provide audible access to statewide public notices, newspaper articles of interest, and other information, particularly at the local level, to persons who are visually handicapped.”

Amendments. The 2019 amendment, in (a), and (d) substituted “Department of Commerce” for “Department of Human Services”; and made a stylistic change.

Publisher's Notes. These sections, concerning the former Division of Youth Services of the Department of Human Services, were repealed by Acts 1995, No. 1261, § 18. The sections were derived from the following sources:

25-10-301. Acts 1993, No. 1296, § 1.

25-10-302. Acts 1993, No. 1296, §§ 2, 3.

25-10-303. Acts 1993, No. 1296, § 3.

25-10-304. Acts 1993, No. 1296, § 3.

25-10-305. Acts 1993, No. 1296, § 3.

For present law, see §9-28-201 et seq.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 1995, No. 1162, § 3 provided:

“All powers vested in the State Hospital Board and Arkansas Youth Services Board are hereby transferred by type one transfer to the DHS State Institutional System Board, and any reference to the State Hospital Board or the Arkansas Youth Services Board contained in the Arkansas Code of 1987 Annotated, shall be deemed to refer to the DHS State Institutional System Board.”

Cross References. Division of Youth Services, §9-28-201 et seq.

Effective Dates. Acts 2007, No. 384, § 11: Mar. 19, 2007. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that many services delivered by the various divisions, offices, and units the Department of Health and Human Services are essential to the public health, safety, and welfare; that the state fiscal year begins July 1; that beginning the process of decoupling the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services from the Department of Health and Human Services during a fiscal year will cause disruptions of services and unnecessary time, effort, and expense in reallocating appropriations, budgets, personnel, equipment, and capital expenditures during a fiscal year; and that this act is immediately necessary because a delay beyond the beginning of the fiscal year will disrupt essential programs and services. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist and this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on: (1) The date of its approval by the Governor; (2) If the bill is neither approved nor vetoed by the Governor, the expiration of the period of time during which the Governor may veto the bill; or (3) If the bill is vetoed by the Governor and the veto is overridden, the date the last house overrides the veto.”

Acts 2019, No. 910, § 6346(b): July 1, 2019. Emergency clause provided: “It is found and determined by the General Assembly of the State of Arkansas that this act revises the duties of certain state entities; that this act establishes new departments of the state; that these revisions impact the expenses and operations of state government; and that the sections of this act other than the two uncodified sections of this act preceding the emergency clause titled ‘Funding and classification of cabinet-level department secretaries’ and ‘Transformation and Efficiencies Act transition team’ should become effective at the beginning of the fiscal year to allow for implementation of the new provisions at the beginning of the fiscal year. Therefore, an emergency is declared to exist, and Sections 1 through 6343 of this act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health, and safety shall become effective on July 1, 2019”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 74, § 2; 2019, No. 910, §§ 617, 618.

Subchapter 3

— Division of Youth Services

25-10-301 — 25-10-305. [Repealed.]

25-10-401. Creation.

The state institutions known as the Arkansas State Hospital at Little Rock, the Arkansas Health Center at Benton, the Arkansas Services Center at Jonesboro, the youth services center located at North Little Rock, the Arkansas Juvenile Assessment and Treatment Center located in Saline County, and all other facilities owned and operated by the department for youth services or mental health treatment are consolidated to form the Department of Human Services State Institutional System.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1162, § 1; 1997, No. 1333, § 2; 2005, No. 1954, § 10; 2007, No. 384, § 10; 2007, No. 855, § 1; 2009, No. 549, § 2.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2005, No. 1954, § 1, provided:

“Legislative purpose.

“(a)The General Assembly declares that this act is necessary to:

“(1)Improve the health of the citizens of Arkansas in an effective and efficient manner; and

“(2)Provide for administrative cost savings in the delivery of health-related programs by combining overlapping functions and eliminating duplications of functions of the Department of Health and the Department of Human Services.

“(b)It is the intent of the General Assembly to provide for an orderly transfer of powers, authorities, duties, and functions of the Department of Health to the Department of Human Services with a minimum of disruption of governmental services and functions and with a minimum of expense.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 1, provides:

“Creation of the Department of Health.

“(a)There is created the Department of Health, that is to be established if the Governor orders the separation of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services from the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(b)If the Governor establishes the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section, the Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall replace all references in the Arkansas Code to the:

“(1)Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services” or “Division of Health” with “Department of Health”; and

“(2)Department of Health and Human Services” with “Department of Human Services”.

“(c)Sections 2 through 12 of this act become effective only if the Governor establishes the Department of Health under subsection (a) of this section.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 2, provides:

“Transfer of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services out of the Department of Health and Human Services.

“(a)Effective sixty (60) days after the Governor establishes the Department of Health under this act, and as provided in the orders of the Governor, the following may be transferred to the Department of Health:

“(1)Authority, powers, duties, and functions as established by law for the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, including purchasing, budgeting, fiscal, accounting, human resources, payroll, legal, information systems, maintenance, program support, administrative support, and other management functions;

“(2)Records, personnel, property, unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, or other funds of the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services;

“(3)Rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications as established by law for the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services, except as otherwise specified in this act.

“(b)Powers, duties, and functions, including without limitation, rulemaking, regulation, and licensing, promulgation of rules, rates, regulations, and standards, budgetary responsibilities, and the rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications as established by law for the Breast Cancer Control Program or other transferred entities within the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services shall be retained as they existed on June 30, 2005.

“(c)The Governor may appoint a Surgeon General in accordance with §20-7-103.”

Acts 2007, No. 384, § 3, provides:

“Transfer of the State Board of Health to the Department of Health.

“(a)Effective sixty (60) days after the Department of Health is established, the State Board of Health shall be transferred to the Department of Health.

“(b)The State Board of Health shall receive administrative support from the Department of Health and shall retain the same powers, authorities, duties, and functions prescribed by law as it had before the transfer and shall have all rule-making authority prescribed by law to the Division of Health of the Department of Health and Human Services before the transfer, except as provided for in this act, including, without limitation:

“(1)Rule making, licensing, and registration;

“(2)The promulgation of rules, rates, and standards;

“(3)Examining, investigating, inspecting, and reviewing; and

“(4)The rendering of findings, orders, and adjudications.”

Acts 2014, No. 261, § 22, provided: “ARKANSAS HEALTH CENTER.

“(A)The Department of Human Services shall not close the Arkansas Health Center that provides skilled nursing through specialized services and programs.

“(B)The Department of Human Services shall continue to accept clients for whom it has determined that skilled nursing and specialized services are needed at the Arkansas Health Center.

“(C)No funds shall be transferred or reduced from the Arkansas Health Center, except for use as federal matching funds, below the approved funding level on March 1, 2003 without the prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee.

“(D)Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Human Services authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 981, § 22, provided: “ARKANSAS HEALTH CENTER.

“(A)The Department of Human Services shall not close the Arkansas Health Center that provides skilled nursing through specialized services and programs.

“(B)The Department of Human Services shall continue to accept clients for whom it has determined that skilled nursing and specialized services are needed at the Arkansas Health Center.

“(C)No funds shall be transferred or reduced from the Arkansas Health Center, except for use as federal matching funds, below the approved funding level on March 1, 2003 without the prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee.

“(D)Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Human Services authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 93, § 22, provided: “ARKANSAS HEALTH CENTER.

“(A)The Department of Human Services shall not close the Arkansas Health Center that provides skilled nursing through specialized services and programs.

“(B)The Department of Human Services shall continue to accept clients for whom it has determined that skilled nursing and specialized services are needed at the Arkansas Health Center.

“(C)No funds shall be transferred or reduced from the Arkansas Health Center, except for use as federal matching funds, below the approved funding level on March 1, 2003 without the prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee.

“(D)Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Human Services authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 840, § 16, provided: “ARKANSAS HEALTH CENTER.

“(A)The Department of Human Services shall not close the Arkansas Health Center that provides skilled nursing through specialized services and programs.

“(B)The Department of Human Services shall continue to accept clients for whom it has determined that skilled nursing and specialized services are needed at the Arkansas Health Center.

“(C)No funds shall be transferred or reduced from the Arkansas Health Center, except for use as federal matching funds, below the approved funding level on March 1, 2003 without the prior approval of the Arkansas Legislative Council or the Joint Budget Committee.

“(D)Determining the maximum amount of appropriation and general revenue funding for a state agency each fiscal year is the prerogative of the General Assembly. This is usually accomplished by delineating such maximums in the appropriation act(s) for a state agency and the general revenue allocations authorized for each fund and fund account by amendment to the Revenue Stabilization law. Further, the General Assembly has determined that the Department of Human Services may operate more efficiently if some flexibility is provided to the Department of Human Services authorizing broad powers under this Section. Therefore, it is both necessary and appropriate that the General Assembly maintain oversight by requiring prior approval of the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee as provided by this section. The requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is not a severable part of this section. If the requirement of approval by the Legislative Council or Joint Budget Committee is ruled unconstitutional by a court of competent jurisdiction, this entire section is void.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote the section to correct agency names.

25-10-402. Purpose — Guidelines.

The Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board is established to manage the Department of Human Services State Institutional System, as provided and intended by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33.

The board shall perform its functions and duties in accordance with the general guidelines, policies, and rules of the Department of Human Services governing divisions, offices, sections, or units within the department with respect to budgets, personnel and personnel policies, records, purchasing, bookkeeping, and other administrative procedures prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment rewrote (a).

The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (b).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910, in (b), substituted “Department of Human Services” for “department” and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1162, § 2; 2005, No. 1954, § 11; 2007, No. 384, § 10; 2009, No. 549, § 3; 2019, No. 315, § 2922; 2019, No. 910, § 5256.

25-10-403. Members.

The Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board shall consist of a membership of seven (7).

The individual members will be appointed by the Governor.

History.

Acts 1995, No. 1162, § 4.

25-10-404. Arkansas Juvenile Assessment and Treatment Center.

The youth services center located at Alexander shall be known as the “Arkansas Juvenile Assessment and Treatment Center”.

History.

Acts 2007, No. 855, § 2.